pl: Odmiana choy sum: Mini (baby); Cai xin; Karbowana (kerinting); Kwitnąca (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Szpinak musztardowy; Nai you; Typu szpinak (poh choy); Słodka; Tendergreen; Pędy / kiełki; Inna
nb: Choy sum-variant: Baby; Cai xin; Kruset (kerinting); Blomstrende (fa / sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Sennepsspinat; Nai you; Spinattype (poh choy); Søt; Tendergreen; Topper / skudd; Annen
ru: Сорт чой-сам: Беби; Цай-синь; Кудрявый (керинтинг); Цветущий (fa/sawi bunga); Гонконгский; Гай-чой; Комацуна; Мисоме; Горчичный шпинат; Най-ю; Шпинатный (poh choy); Сладкий; Тендергрин; Побеги / ростки; Другой
en: Choy sum variety: Baby; Cai xin; Curly (kerinting); Flowering (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Mustard spinach; Nai you; Spinach type (poh choy); Sweet; Tendergreen; Tips/shoots; Other
zh-CN: 菜心品种: 菜心苗; 菜心; 卷叶型; 开花型; 香港菜心; 芥菜; 小松菜; 塌棵菜; 芥末菠菜; 奶油白菜; 菠菜型（poh choy）; 甜心; 嫩绿; 菜苔/菜尖; 其他
ko: 청경채 종류: 베이비; 차이신; 곱슬(커린팅); 꽃(파/사위 분가); 홍콩; 카이초이; 코마츠나; 미소메; 겨자 시금치; 나이요우; 시금치 유형(포초이); 스위트; 텐더그린; 팁/새싹; 기타
lt-LT: Choy sum rūšis: Mažieji; „Cai xin“; Garbiniuotieji (kerinting); Žydintys (fa/sawi bunga); Honkongo; „Kai choy“; Komacunos; „Misome“; Garstyčių špinatai; „Nai you“; Špinatų tipo (poh choy); Saldieji; „Tendergreen“; Viršūnėlės / ūgliai; Kita
el: Ποικιλία Choy sum: Baby; Cai xin; Κατσαρό (kerinting); Ανθισμένο (fa/sawi bunga); Χονγκ Κονγκ; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Σπανάκι μουστάρδας; Nai you; Τύπου σπανάκι (poh choy); Γλυκό; Tendergreen; Κορυφές/βλαστοί; Άλλη
da: Choy sum-sort: Baby; Cai xin; Krøllet (kerinting); Blomstrende (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Sennepsspinat; Nai you; Spinattype (poh choy); Sød; Tendergreen; Spidser/skud; Andet
it: Varietà di Choy sum: Baby; Cai xin; Riccio (kerinting); Da fiore (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Senape spinacio; Nai you; Tipo spinacio (poh choy); Dolce; Tendergreen; Punte/germogli; Altro
fi: Sellerikaalin lajike: Baby; Cai xin; Kihara (kerinting); Kukkiva (fa / sawi bunga); Hongkong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Sinappipinaatti; Nai you; Pinaattityyppinen (poh choy); Makea; Tendergreen; Latvat/versot; Muu
de: Choy-Sum-Sorte: Baby; Cai Xin; Gelockt (Kerinting); Blühend (Fa/Sawi Bunga); Hong Kong; Kai Choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Senfspinat; Nai You; Spinat-Typ (Poh Choy); Süß; Tendergreen; Spitzen/Sprossen; Sonstige
sk-SK: Odroda Choy sum: Baby; Cai xin; Kučeravá (kerinting); Kvitnúca (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Horčicový špenát; Nai you; Špenátový typ (poh choy); Sladká; Tendergreen; Špičky/výhonky; Iné
vi: Giống cải thìa: Non; Cải ngọt (Cai xin); Xoăn (kerinting); Có hoa (fa/sawi bunga); Hồng Kông; Cải bẹ xanh (Kai choy); Komatsuna; Misome; Cải bẹ xanh; Nai you; Kiểu cải bó xôi (poh choy); Ngọt; Tendergreen; Ngọn/đọt non; Khác
hu: Choy sum fajtája: Bébi; Cai xin; Fodros (kerinting); Virágzó (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Mustárspenót; Nai you; Spenót típusú (poh choy); Édes; Tendergreen; Hajtás/csíra; Egyéb
sl-SI: Sorta kitajskega zelja: Mladi; Cai xin; Kodrasti (kerinting); Cvetoči (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Gorčična špinača; Nai you; Vrsta špinače (poh choy); Sladki; Tendergreen; Vršički/poganjki; Drugo
ja: チョイサムの種類: ベビー; ツァイシン; カーリー (クリンティン); 花付き (ファ/サウィ・ブンガ); 香港; カイチョイ; 小松菜; 味美菜; マスタードスピナッチ; ナイヨウ; ほうれん草タイプ (ポーチョイ); スイート; テンダーグリーン; 先端/新芽; その他
es: Variedad de choy sum: Baby; Cai xin; Rizado (kerinting); En flor (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Espinaca mostaza; Nai you; Tipo espinaca (poh choy); Dulce; Tendergreen; Puntas/brotes; Otro
sv: Blomsellerikålsort: Baby; Cai xin; Krusig (kerinting); Blommande (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Senapsspenat; Nai you; Spenattyp (poh choy); Söt; Tendergreen; Toppar/skott; Annan
pt-BR: Variedade de choy sum: Mini; Cai xin; Crespo (kerinting); Em flor (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Espinafre-mostarda; Nai you; Tipo espinafre (poh choy); Doce; Tendergreen; Pontas/brotos; Outro
fr: Variété de choy sum: Jeune; Cai xin; Frisé (kerinting); Fleuri (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Épinard moutarde; Nai you; Type épinard (poh choy); Doux; Tendergreen; Pointes/pousses; Autre
bg-BG: Сорт чой сум: Бейби; Cai xin; Къдрав (kerinting); Цъфтящ (fa/sawi bunga); Хонконг; Кай чой; Комацуна; Мисоме; Синапен спанак; Най ю; Тип спанак (poh choy); Сладък; Tendergreen; Връхчета/издънки; Друго
th: สายพันธุ์ผักกวางตุ้ง: เบบี้; ฉ่ายซิน; หยิก (Kerinting); ออกดอก (Fa/Sawi bunga); ฮ่องกง; ไก๊ฉ่อย; โคมัตสึนะ; มิโซเมะ; ผักกาดเขียวปลี; หนายโหยว; ประเภทปวยเล้ง (Poh choy); หวาน; เทนเดอร์กรีน; ยอด/หน่อ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Varietatea de Choy sum: Baby; Cai xin; Creață (kerinting); Înflorită (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Spanac-muștar; Nai you; Tip spanac (poh choy); Dulce; Tendergreen; Vârfuri/Lăstari; Altele
tr: Choy sum çeşidi: Bebek; Cai xin; Kıvırcık (kerinting); Çiçekli (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Hardal ıspanağı; Nai you; Ispanak tipi (poh choy); Tatlı; Tendergreen; Uç/filiz; Diğer
hr-HR: Sorta choy suma: Baby; Cai xin; Kovrčavi (kerinting); Cvjetni (fa / sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Gorušica špinat; Nai you; Vrsta špinata (poh choy); Slatki; Tendergreen; Vrhovi/izdanci; Ostalo
zh-TW: 菜心品種: 菜心苗; 菜心; 捲葉 (kerinting); 開花 (fa/sawi bunga); 香港; 芥菜; 小松菜; 味美菜 (Misome); 芥菜菠菜; 奶油; 菠菜型 (菠菜); 甜; 綠嫩; 菜尖/嫩芽; 其他
cs: Odrůda Choy sum: Baby; Cai xin; Kadeřavý (kerinting); Kvetoucí (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Hořčičný špenát; Nai you; Typ špenát (poh choy); Sladký; Tendergreen; Výhonky; Jiné
nl: Choy sum variëteit: Baby; Cai xin; Krullend (kerinting); Bloeiend (fa/sawi bunga); Hongkong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Mosterdspinazie; Nai you; Spinazietype (poh choy); Zoet; Tendergreen; Toppen/scheuten; Anders
pt-PT: Variedade de Choy sum: Baby; Cai xin; Encaracolada (kerinting); Em flor (fa/sawi bunga); Hong Kong; Kai choy; Komatsuna; Misome; Espinafre-mostarda; Nai you; Tipo espinafre (poh choy); Doce; Tendergreen; Pontas/rebentos; Outro